Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
81-12,141
Legislative intent for appropriations.

It is the intent
of the Legislature to appropriate two hundred thousand dollars from the General
Fund for FY2011-12 and two hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund
for FY2012-13 for the purpose of providing funding to carry out the Small
Business Innovation Act.

Laws 2011, LB345, § 6.
December 31, 2013